Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. Wyoming Health Insurance Pool Act
§ 26-43-113.
Termination of provisions.

This act is not effective after June 30, 2030.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 58, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

26-42-113

; Laws 1995, ch. 94, § 2; 2001, ch. 22, § 1; 2005, ch. 57, § 1; 2011, ch. 56, § 1; 2015 ch. 58, § 1, effective February 26, 2015; 2019 ch. 16, § 1, effective February 14, 2019.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “2011” for “2005”.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “2015” for “2011.”

The 2015 amendment

substituted “June 30, 2020” for “June 30, 2015.”

Laws 2015, ch. 58, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2019 amendment,

substituted "2030" for "2020".

Laws 2019, ch. 16, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 14, 2019.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 26-43-101(a)(xx).

§ 26-43-114.
Enrollment capacity planning.

The board shall annually estimate the funds available to the plan through premiums, assessments and legislative appropriations for the subsequent fiscal year and shall determine the maximum number of individuals who may be enrolled for that year without incurring total costs of operation in excess of estimated available funds. The board shall take steps necessary to assure that plan enrollment does not exceed the maximum enrollment capacity determined for that year. In determining enrollment capacity for purposes of this section, the board shall provide for the enrollment in the pool of all federally eligible individuals.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 202, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, Ch. 202, § 3 states as follows: “The Wyoming health insurance pool board of directors and the insurance commissioner shall provide a report to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee by September 1, 2008 regarding the effectiveness of this act, including the number of additional participants enrolled, a projection of additional enrollees for the fiscal period beginning July 1, 2008 and ending June 30, 2010, an analysis of the usage of all assessment and general fund monies, including a projection of a potential increase in general fund appropriations for the fiscal period beginning July 1, 2008 and ending June 30, 2010 and any recommended modifications to the Wyoming health insurance pool operations or funding.
The report shall further illustrate the proportionate share of total funding provided by enrolled members, premium tax credits and insurer assessments not allowed as premium tax credits.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, Ch. 202, § 2 states as follows: “There is appropriated to the insurance department for the purposes of this act three million dollars ($3,000,000.00) from the general fund for the remainder of the fiscal biennium ending June 30, 2008.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 202, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.